Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3951.02
Board members; nomination and appointment.

New members of the board shall be nominated and appointed as follows:

(1) Each first purchaser of milk which purchases milk from at least twenty-one milk producers may submit to the Governor the names of up to two nominees for each forty milk production units, or major portion thereof, from which the first purchaser purchases milk. The Governor shall appoint one member for each forty production units, or major portion thereof, from nominees submitted pursuant to this subdivision; and

(2) All other first purchasers of milk and individual producer-processors who are not included among milk production units claimed by a first purchaser of milk entitled to submit nominees under subdivision (1) of this section shall be combined as a group for the purpose of submitting nominees, and each first purchaser and individual producer-processor of the group may nominate up to two nominees. The Governor shall appoint two nominees from nominees submitted pursuant to this subdivision.

Laws 2004, LB 836, § 4.